Utah statutes.
10-8-57.   Inspection of boilers -- Licensing of stationary engineers.

They may provide for the inspection and may regulate the use of steam boilers, provide for the examination, regulation and licensing of stationary engineers and others having charge or control of stationary engines, motors, boilers or steam or power generating apparatus, or elevators, within the corporate limits of the city.



No Change Since 1953

